Massachusetts, session 194th, H4960.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 48 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following
section:-
Section 91. (a)(1) A firefighter employed as a full-time paid employee of a fire
department of a city, town, fire or water district or the commonwealth, shall be provided a
neurological disorder screening examination conducted by a physician not less than 3 years after
the start of their employment as a firefighter and every 3 years thereafter during the course of
their employment.
(2) This section shall also apply to members of the: (i) Massachusetts military reservation
fire department; (ii) 104th fighter wing fire department; and (iii) Devens fire department
established pursuant to chapter 498 of the acts of 1993.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the following shall be fire districts, the: (i)
Massachusetts Port Authority; (ii) Massachusetts Military Reservation; (iii) Barnes Air National
of 2

Guard Base; and (iv) Devens Regional Enterprise Zone established pursuant to chapter 498 of
the acts of 1993.
(b) The examination shall include screenings for, at a minimum and when applicable, the
following neurological disorders: (i) Amyotrophic Lateral Sclerosis also known as ALS; (ii)
Alzheimer’s disease; (iii) brain tumor; (iv) cerebral palsy; (v) dementia; (vi) epilepsy; (vii)
Parkinson’s disease; (viii) multiple sclerosis; and (ix) stroke.
(c) All costs associated with screenings pursuant to chapters 32A, 175, 176A, 176B,
176G and 176I provided under this section shall be borne by the firefighter’s health care benefits
plan or program provided by the firefighter’s employer. No co-payment, deductible, coinsurance
or any out-of-pocket expense shall be required for such examinations, provided, however, that
cost sharing shall be required if the applicable plan is governed by the Federal Internal Revenue
Code and would lose its tax-exempt status as a result of the prohibition on such for these
services.
of 2